Rhode Island, session 2025, SB735.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 42-28.2-8 of the General Laws in Chapter 42-28.2 entitled "Police
Officers — Commission on Standards and Training" is hereby amended to read as follows:
42-28.2-8. Establishment of standards.
(a) The commission on standards and training shall prepare and publish mandatory training
standards, not applicable to the city of Providence, and to be promulgated with due consideration
to varying factors and special requirements of local police agencies, the division of enforcement of
the department of environmental management and the board of regents relative to:
(1) Minimum standards of physical, educational, mental and moral fitness which shall
govern the recruitment, selection, and apportionment of police officers; provided, however, that the
minimum height and weight standards for local police officers shall be determined by each
municipality.
(2) The commission with the approval of the director of public safety will establish the
courses of training, and set rules and regulations relative to the education, physical standards, and
personal character of candidates and trainees.
(3) Minimum course of study, attendance requirements, equipment, and facilities required
at the municipal police training school, or other approved training schools certified pursuant to §
42-28.2-6.
(4) Minimum qualification for instructors at the municipal police training school, or other

approved training schools certified pursuant to § 42-28.2-6.
(5) Minimum basic training requirements which police officers appointed to probationary
terms shall complete before being eligible for continued or permanent employment, and the term
within which that basic training must be completed following such appointment to a probationary
term.
(6) Minimum basic training requirements which police officers not appointed for
probationary terms but appointed on other than a permanent basis shall complete before being
eligible for continued employment.
(7) Categories or classifications of advanced in-service training programs and minimum
courses of study and attendance requirements for those categories or classifications.
(8) The establishment of subordinate regional training centers in strategic geographic
locations in order to serve the greatest number of local police agencies that are unable to support
their own training programs.
(b) The commission shall establish a schedule of sessions of the school, of which there
shall be a minimum of one session per year.
(c) The commission shall authorize the establishment of police training schools by any
municipality which demonstrates that it can satisfactorily meet the minimum standards established
for police training schools.
(d) The commission shall establish an equivalency of training certification program within
the municipal police training academy which allows for the certification of any candidate subject
to its oversight. Such certification shall apply to any candidate who:
(1) Has worked at least one year, full-time as a sworn law enforcement officer;
(2) Has received training which is comparable to the standards as set forth in subsection
(a) of this section; and
(3) Has no more than an eight (8) year break-in-service since the candidate's last separation
from a sworn law enforcement position.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002264
========
LC002264 - Page 2 of 3